Rhode Island statutes. Title 40.1 Behavioral Healthcare, Developmental Disabilities and Hospitals
Chapter 24.6 Self-Insurance of Developmental Disability Agencies

40.1-24.6-1.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Developmental disability agency” means any organization that has been established and licensed by the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals for the purpose of providing either employment, vocational supports, residential and/or day-support services for adults with developmental disabilities in Rhode Island.

“Qualified third-party administrator” means an entity with at least five (5) years of experience creating and operating health-benefit plans that maintain sufficiently capitalized self-insurance funds of similar characteristics of the fund being authorized in accordance with this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2017, ch. 405, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 421, § 1.

40.1-24.6-2.
Purpose.

The purpose of this chapter is to authorize operators of developmental disability agencies acting as a group, to self-insure healthcare costs for employees, retirees, and other beneficiaries and allow a qualified third-party administrator to administer the program.

History of Section.

P.L. 2017, ch. 405, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 421, § 1.

40.1-24.6-3.
Authorization to self-insure.

Operators of two (2) or more developmental disability agencies are hereby authorized and empowered to:

Create a separate corporation (the “corporation”) for the purpose of issuing healthcare insurance to the corporation members’ employees and their dependents, and their retirees and their dependents; and

To develop and administer a sufficiently capitalized, self-insured group-risk-management program (product).

The corporation may have as its purposes the reduction of the risk of its members; distributing, sharing, and pooling risks; acquiring excess loss insurance; and processing and defending claims against the members of the corporation. Any contributions made to the corporation for the purpose of distributing, sharing, or pooling risks shall be made on an actuarially sound basis, and the corporation shall have an audit performed annually, copies of which shall be provided to the corporation membership.

The corporation shall not be considered an insurance company, and shall not be subject to the provisions of the laws or regulations of the state of Rhode Island regulating insurance companies and multiple employer welfare arrangements, and therefore, shall not be subject to regulation by the Rhode Island department of business regulation or the Rhode Island office of the health insurance commissioner.

The corporation created pursuant to the provisions of this chapter will be created by filing articles of incorporation pursuant to chapter 6 of title 7 entitled “Rhode Island Nonprofit Corporation Act,” and the articles of incorporation will be filed by an incorporating developmental disability agency (member). The articles of incorporation creating the corporation pursuant to the provisions of this section may contain provisions, not inconsistent with this section, that the incorporators (members) determine to be desirable or useful in fulfilling the purposes set forth in this section. The corporation created pursuant to the provisions of this section will have all of the powers of a nonprofit corporation created under chapter 6 of title 7.

Whenever the governing board of the corporation created pursuant to the provisions of this chapter determines that the purposes for which the corporation was created have been substantially fulfilled and all bonds, notes, or other obligations of the corporation have been fully paid or adequate provision has been made for their payment, the corporation may be dissolved in the manner provided for nonprofit corporations pursuant to chapter 6 of title 7 and, upon the corporation’s dissolution, title to all financial resources and assets of the corporation shall vest in and become the property of the members of the corporation in proportions that are provided for in the corporation’s articles of incorporation.

History of Section.

P.L. 2017, ch. 405, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 421, § 1.

40.1-24.6-4.
Obligations of participating entities.

Operators of developmental disability agencies intending to participate in the corporation shall enter into a contractual agreement with the corporation that shall, among other provisions, describe and define each member’s obligations relative to funding, length of commitment, liabilities, and participation in the program. Such an agreement shall also define and delineate the terms upon which an operator may disaffiliate from the corporation and agreement. The agreements shall also include provisions that require members to be jointly and severally liable for losses of the self-insurance fund and shall include the mechanism for distributing such losses. The state of Rhode Island shall be immune from liability for losses of the self-insurance fund.

History of Section.

P.L. 2017, ch. 405, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 421, § 1.

40.1-24.6-5.
Establishment of fund.

A fund may be established to insure the healthcare costs of the corporation members’ employees, their covered dependents, the retirees and their covered dependents, not otherwise insured, to the extent determined by the corporation’s articles of incorporation. Efforts will be made to establish uniformity among health-benefit plans issued to these employees, retirees, and dependents.

History of Section.

P.L. 2017, ch. 405, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 421, § 1.

40.1-24.6-6.
Payment to and from fund.

The monies in the fund will be used as nonlapsing, revolving financial resources for carrying out the provisions of this chapter.

The financial notes and obligations issued by the corporation, pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, will not be deemed to constitute a debt or liability of the state of Rhode Island, nor a political subdivision of the state, but will be payable solely from the revenues or assets of the fund.

History of Section.

P.L. 2017, ch. 405, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 421, § 1.

40.1-24.6-7.
Stop-loss coverage.

The corporation established pursuant to this chapter for the purpose of providing healthcare costs for members’ employees, retirees, and other beneficiaries must participate in a group stop-loss policy provided by a licensed insurance company.

The group stop-loss policy coverage will include a specific deductible stop-loss policy, and aggregate stop-loss coverage, both of which will apply to the corporation’s participating developmental disability agencies.

Under the specific deductible stop-loss coverage, the licensed insurance carrier will assume liability beyond the specific deductible amount up to the limits of the policy.

For the aggregate stop-loss coverage, the licensed insurance carrier will assume all of the claims threshold:

Beyond one hundred and twenty percent (120%) of the expected claims for the policy year, up to the limits of the policy, or, if unavailable;

Beyond a percentage rate that is consistent with marketplace standards for aggregate stop-loss insurance, but not to exceed one hundred and twenty-five percent (125%) of expected claims for the policy year.

In addition to stop-loss policy coverage, the corporation must place in reserve an appropriate amount of money to cover the estimated cost of claims incurred, but unpaid, during the term of the policy or contract which shall be added to the expected claim level. The reserves for unpaid claims shall be in addition to monies reserved to cover the claims paid during the term of the policy, or contract for payment of healthcare costs for the employees, retirees, and other beneficiaries.

History of Section.

P.L. 2017, ch. 405, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 421, § 1.